District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

8-115.05

Certification requirements for individuals and business entities to conduct lead-based paint abatement; risk assessment and inspection of lead-based paint hazards, lead-contaminated dust, and lead-contaminated soil; or planning, project designing, and supervision of lead-based paint activities.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 9 1997, D.C. Law 11-221, § 6, 43 DCR 6854
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-347, § 2(e), 52 DCR 2627
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 36(a), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 21(a), 56 DCR 1596

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-997.5.